Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3303
Career pathway, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, career pathway means an identified series of positions, work experiences, or educational benchmarks or credentials with multiple access points that offers occupational and financial advancement within a specified career field or related fields over time. Career pathways offer combined programs of rigorous and high-quality education, training, and other services that do all of the following:

(1) Align with the skill needs of industries in the state and regional economies;

(2) Prepare an individual to be successful in any of a full range of secondary or postsecondary education options, including apprenticeships registered under the National Apprenticeship Act, 29 U.S.C. 50 et seq., except apprenticeships under 29 U.S.C. 3226;

(3) Include counseling to support an individual in achieving the individual's education and career goals;

(4) Include, as appropriate, education offered concurrently with and in the same context as workforce preparation activities and training for a specific occupation;

(5) Organize education, training, and other services to meet the particular needs of an individual in a manner that accelerates the educational and career advancement of the individual to the extent practicable;

(6) Enable an individual to attain a secondary school diploma or its recognized equivalent and at least one recognized postsecondary credential; and

(7) Help an individual enter or advance within a specific occupation.

Laws 2016, LB1110, § 3.